Nebraska, session 109, LB1158.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1158 LB1158
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 75-304.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
75-304.04 (1) Any motor carrier, including a transportation network
company, operating in this state engaged in the intrastate transportation
for hire of employees of a railroad carrier engaged in interstate
commerce to or from their work locations shall apply to the commission
for a license prior to transporting such employees in intrastate
commerce. A license shall be issued by the commission to any qualified
applicant upon payment of a license fee of two hundred fifty dollars and
receipt of a completed application in which the principal place of
business of the applicant in the State of Nebraska is identified and the
applicant agrees and affirms to perform the service in conformance with
section 75-307 and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by
the commission relating to driver qualifications, equipment, operating
standards, and record keeping. Otherwise the application shall be denied.
Applications for initial and renewal licenses shall be on forms
prescribed by the commission. A license issued under this section shall
be valid for one year and may be renewed annually for a fee of two
hundred fifty dollars. A license may be suspended or revoked by the
commission after notice and hearing for failure to comply with section
75-307, and any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated under this
section, or any lawful order of the commission.
(2) Any person who applies for a license pursuant to this section
shall comply with the requirements of section 75-307. The commission
shall have no authority to regulate the rates of any motor carrier who is
issued a license under this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 75-304.04, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-